Tennessee, session 114, HB0998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-1804(f), is amended by deleting
"and the department of safety" and substituting ", the department of safety, and the general
assembly".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0998
002936
- 1 -